Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1521.23
Commercial hazardous waste management facility permit; revocation; when.

The director may revoke the permit for a commercial hazardous waste management facility, pursuant to subsection (3) of section 81-1507, if he or she finds that the facility is not being operated in accordance with the Environmental Protection Act and rules and regulations adopted and promulgated thereunder.

Laws 1980, LB 853, § 13;

R.S.1943, (1981), § 81-1521.06;

Laws 1987, LB 114, § 17;

Laws 1987, LB 152, § 10.